Utah statutes.
73-10d-3.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Agreement" means a short-term agreement or a long-term agreement.
(2)  "Bonds" means obligations issued by a municipality or a county under
Title 11, Chapter 17, the Utah Industrial Facilities and Development Act, and
the provisions of this chapter.
(3)  "Cost" means, with respect to any privatization project or facility
related thereto, without limitation:
(a)  all costs of designing, planning, acquiring, constructing,
reconstructing, modifying, improving, maintaining, equipping, extending,
furnishing, and placing in service any privatization project, including
architectural, planning, engineering, legal, and fiscal advisors' fees or
costs, and any costs incident to the acquisition of any necessary property,
easement, or right-of-way;
(b)  any costs incurred for preliminary planning to determine the economic or
engineering feasibility of a proposed privatization project, including,
without limitation, costs of economic investigations and studies, surveys,
preparation of designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, and
inspection and supervision of the construction of any facility;
(c)  all costs incident to the purchase, installation, or financing of
equipment, machinery, and other personal property required by a privatization
project;
(d)  all costs incident to the authorization and issuance of bonds, including
accountants' fees, attorneys' fees, financial advisors' fees, underwriting
fees, including bond discount, and other professional services and printing
costs;
(e)  all costs incident to the establishment and funding of appropriate
reserve funds; and
(f)  interest estimated to accrue on any bonds issued to finance a
privatization project for a reasonable period of time prior to construction,
during construction, and for a reasonable period of time after construction.
(4)  "Drinking water project" means any work or facility necessary or
desirable to provide water for human consumption and other domestic uses which
has at least 15 service connections or serves an average of 25 individuals
daily for at least 60 days of the year and includes collection, treatment,
storage, and distribution facilities under the control of the private
owner/operator and used primarily with the work or facility, and collection,
pretreatment, or storage facilities used primarily in connection with the work
or facility but not under the control of the private owner/operator, and any
related structures and facilities.
(5)  "Facility" means any structure, building, machinery, system, land, water
right, or other property necessary or desirable to provide the services
contemplated by a privatization project, including, without limitation, all
related and appurtenant easements and rights-of-way, improvements, utilities,
landscaping, sidewalks, roads, curbs and gutters, and equipment and
furnishings.
(6)  "Governing authority" means the persons, board, body, or entity in which
the legislative powers of a political subdivision are vested.
(7)  "Governing body" means the body in which the general legislative powers
of a municipality or county are vested.
(8)  "Long-term agreement" means an agreement or contract having a term of
more than five years and less than 50 years.
(9)  "Municipality" means any incorporated city or town in the state,
including cities or towns operating under home rule charters.
(10)  "Political subdivision" means the state or any municipality, county
improvement district, water conservancy district, special service district,
drainage district, metropolitan water district, irrigation district, separate
legal or administrative entity created under the Interlocal Cooperation Act,
or any other entity constituting a political subdivision under the laws of the
state.
(11)  "Private owner/operator" means a person that is not a political
subdivision and which owns and operates a privatization project.
(12)  "Privatization project" means all or part of any drinking water, water,
or wastewater project which is owned or operated by a private owner/operator,
and provides the related services to political subdivisions.
(13)  "Short-term agreement" means any contract or agreement having a term of
five years or less.
(14)  "Supervising agency" means the Water Development Coordinating Council
created in Section 73-10c-3.
(15)  "Wastewater project" means any sewer, sewage system, sewage treatment
facility, lagoon, sewage collection facility and system and related pipelines,
and all similar systems, works, and facilities necessary or desirable to
collect, hold, cleanse, or purify any sewage or other polluted waters of this
state, and related structures and facilities.
(16)  "Water project" means any work or facility necessary or desirable to
conserve, develop, protect, or treat the waters of this state including,
without limitation, any reservoir, diversion dam, electrical generation
system, irrigation dam and system, culinary water system, water work, water
treatment facility, canal, ditch, artesian well, aqueduct, pipeline, conduit,
drain, tunnel, and related structures and facilities.
(17)  "Waters of this state" means any stream, lake, pond, marsh, watercourse,
waterway, well, spring, irrigation system, drainage system, or other body or
accumulation of water, whether surface, underground, natural, artificial,
public or private, or other water resource of the state, which is contained
within or flows in or through the state.
